Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 19 Presidential Electors

Cross references. —

For duties of electors, see U.S. Const. amend. XII.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Elections § 6; 77 Am. Jur. 2d United States § 43.

§ 22-19-101.
When elected; number.

At a general election for president and vice-president of the United States, electors for president and vice-president of the United States shall be elected equal in number to senators and representatives in congress allotted to the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-267.

§ 22-19-102.
Nomination.

In a general election year, the state convention of a political party nominating candidates for president and vice-president of the United States shall nominate the party’s candidates for presidential electors and file certificates of nomination for these candidates with the secretary of state not later than thirty (30) days following termination of the state convention.

Independent candidates for president shall file the candidate’s nominees for presidential electors not less than seventy (70) days prior to the general election. The nominees shall be qualified electors.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-268; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-19-103.
Crediting of votes.

The number of votes received by presidential and vice-presidential candidates is the number of votes credited to their electors.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-269; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 40, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-19-104.
Certificate of election; directive.

Immediately upon filing of the certificate of the state canvassing board stating the result of the election, the governor shall issue a certificate of election to candidates elected to the office of presidential elector. The certificate shall direct the elector to attend a meeting with the governor in the office of the secretary of state at 12:00 noon on the Monday following the second Wednesday in December of presidential election years.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S 1957, § 22.1-270.

§ 22-19-105.
Vacancy in nomination.

A vacancy in nomination for the office of presidential elector occurring before the general election shall be filled by the state central committee of the political party whose vacancy is to be filled or by an independent candidate’s remaining electors, by certifying the name of the person filling the vacancy to the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-271; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-19-106.
Certified electors to meet; vacancies.

Certified electors shall convene in the office of the secretary of state at 12:00 noon on the Monday following the second Wednesday in December of presidential election years. A vacancy in the office of elector for any cause including nonattendance shall be filled and certified by a majority of electors present.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-272.

§ 22-19-107.
College of electors; duties.

When all electors are present and vacancies filled they shall constitute the college of electors of the state of Wyoming and shall perform duties as required by the constitution and laws of the United States.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-273.

§ 22-19-108.
How electors to vote.

All Wyoming electors shall vote for the candidates for the office of president and vice-president receiving the highest number of votes in the Wyoming general election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-274.

§ 22-19-109.
Compensation and mileage.

An elector shall receive fifty dollars ($50.00) compensation and mileage at the present rate for state employees.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-275; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2.